Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-4401
Good Life Transformational Projects Act, how cited.

Sections 77-4401 to 77-4407 shall be known and may be cited as the Good Life Transformational Projects Act.

Laws 2023, LB727, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB707, § 2.